Hawaii statutes.
§312-2.1 Appointment of state librarian;
duties; salary. (a) The state librarian shall be appointed by the board
of education, without regard to chapter 76, shall be under the direction of the
board, shall be responsible for the operation, planning, programming, and
budgeting of all community/school and public libraries within the State, and
may be removed by a majority vote of its members. The state librarian may be
appointed:

(1) Without regard to the state residency provisions
of section 78-1(b); and

(2) For a term of up to four years.

(b) The salary of the state librarian shall be
set by the board of education at a rate no greater than $120,000 a year.

(c) The state librarian may appoint, without
regard to chapter 76, one secretary for the state librarian. The secretary for
the state librarian shall serve at the pleasure of the state librarian.

[(d)] The state librarian shall collect,
purchase, receive gifts of, and otherwise acquire all books and other
publications proper for libraries, and arrange, classify, and catalog the same;
provide for their safekeeping; expend moneys appropriated by the legislature
and otherwise acquired for the development, use, support, and maintenance of
libraries; provide ways and means for placing libraries within reach of all
residents throughout the State and particularly of all public and private
school children; provide and maintain branch libraries, offices, or places for
the distribution of books and periodicals throughout the State; enter into
contracts as may be necessary to carry into effect the general duties herein
imposed; appoint such officers and employees as deemed necessary, all of whom
shall be under the authority of the governor for purposes of chapters 76, 78,
89, and 89C; and adopt rules for the management and use of libraries, and for
the control of the property under its management. [L 1969, c 127, §27; am L
1975, c 58, §16; am L 1979, c 59, §1; am L 1981, c 150, §7; am L 1982, c 129,
§10; am L 1983, c 115, §1; am L 1986, c 128, §9; am L 1987, c 56, §1; am L
1989, c 329, §7; am L 1999, c 75, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2001, c 117,
§1; am L 2012, c 135, §1; am L 2015, c 26, §2]

Revision Note

Enacted as a new section, subsection (d) was redesignated
pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next